District of Columbia statutes.
3-1202.16

Board of Chiropractic.

(a)

There is established a Board of Chiropractic to consist of 5 members appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council.

(b)

The Board shall regulate the practice of chiropractic.

(c)

Of the members of the Board, 3 shall be doctors of chiropractic licensed to practice in the District, 1 shall be the Director of the Department of Health or his or her designee, and 1 shall be a consumer member.

(d)

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, members of the Board shall be appointed for terms of 3 years.

(e)

The members of the Advisory Committee on Chiropractic abolished by the Chiropractic Licensing Amendment Act of 1994 shall continue to serve as members of the Board of Chiropractic established by this section until the expiration of their terms on the Advisory Committee or until successors are appointed, whichever occurs later, and may be reappointed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 216
as added Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-231, § 2(d), 42 DCR 15
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 7(a), 43 DCR 530
Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-228, § 2(d), 53 DCR 10244

History

This section is referenced in § 1-523.01.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 2-3302.16.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 16-228, in subsec. (c), substituted “Director of the Department of Health” for “Commissioner of Public Health”.

Effect of Amendments

The reference in (e) to the “Chiropractic Licensing Amendment Act of 1994” refers to D.C. Law 10-231.

The Advisory Committee on Chiropractic, referred to in (e), was abolished by § 2(c)(5) of D.C. Law 10-231.

References in Text